Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB569.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 342.610 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every employer subject to this chapter shall be liable for compensation for injury,
occupational disease, or death without regard to fault as a cause of the injury,
occupational disease, or death.
(2) A contractor who subcontracts all or any part of a contract and his or her carrier
shall be liable for the payment of compensation to the employees of the
subcontractor unless the subcontractor primarily liable for the payment of such
compensation has secured the payment of compensation as provided for in this
chapter. Any contractor or his or her carrier who shall become liable for such
compensation may recover the amount of such compensation paid and necessary
expenses from the subcontractor primarily liable therefor. A person who contracts
with another:
(a) To have work performed consisting of the removal, excavation, or drilling of
soil, rock, or mineral, or the cutting or removal of timber from land; or
(b) To have work performed of a kind which is a regular or recurrent part of the
work of the trade, business, occupation, or profession of such person;
shall for the purposes of this section be deemed a contractor, and such other person
a subcontractor. This subsection shall not apply to the owner or lessee of land
principally used for agriculture.
(3) Liability for compensation shall not apply to injury, occupational disease, or death
to the employee if the employee willfully intended to injure or kill himself, herself,
or another.
(4) If an employee voluntarily introduced an illegal, nonprescribed substance or
substances or a prescribed substance or substances in amounts in excess of
prescribed amounts into his or her body detected in the blood, as measured by a
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 1/29/2025 2:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1302
scientifically reliable test, that could cause a disturbance of mental or physical
capacities, [it shall be presumed that ]the illegal, nonprescribed substance or
substances or the prescribed substance or substances in amounts in excess of
prescribed amounts shall be the proximate cause of[caused] the injury,
occupational disease, or death of the employee and liability for compensation shall
not apply to the injury, occupational disease, or death to the employee.
(5) If injury or death results to an employee through the deliberate intention of his or
her employer to produce such injury or death, the employee or the employee's
dependent as herein defined shall receive the amount provided in this chapter in a
lump sum to be used, if desired, to prosecute the employer. The dependents may
bring suit against the employer for any amount they desire. If injury or death results
to an employee through the deliberate intention of his or her employer to produce
such injury or death, the employee or the employee's dependents may take under
this chapter, or in lieu thereof, have a cause of action at law against the employer as
if this chapter had not been passed, for such damage so sustained by the employee,
his or her dependents or personal representatives as is recoverable at law. If a suit is
brought under this subsection, all right to compensation under this chapter shall
thereby be waived as to all persons. If a claim is made for the payment of
compensation or any other benefit provided by this chapter, all rights to sue the
employer for damages on account of such injury or death shall be waived as to all
persons.
(6) Prior to issuing any building permit pursuant to KRS 198B.060(10), every local
building official shall require proof of workers' compensation coverage from the
builder before a permit is issued. A person who is exempt under the exception
contained in KRS 342.650(2), and any contractor otherwise exempt from this
chapter, shall so certify to the local building official, in writing and on a form
prescribed by the commissioner, in lieu of providing proof of workers'
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 1/29/2025 2:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1302
compensation coverage.
(7) Every employer subject to this chapter, at its principal office and such other
locations where employees customarily report for payroll and personnel matters,
shall post a notice stating the name of its workers' compensation insurance carrier
and policy number, setting forth the means to access medical care for injuries, the
employee's obligation to give notice of accidents, and such other matters
concerning the employee's rights under this chapter as may be required by the
commissioner so as to afford every employee the opportunity to become informed
about the employer's workers' compensation program. The format and contents of
the notice shall be established by the commissioner through administrative
regulation, and copies shall be provided to the employer by its insurance carrier.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 1/29/2025 2:58 PM Jacketed